Louisiana, session 2026, SB355.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1483.1(G) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1483.1. Louisiana Fortify Homes Program
* * *
G.(1) No later than October 1, 2027, insurers shall provide a premium
discount or insurance rate reduction of not less than twenty percent to insureds
who retrofit insured property pursuant to this Section.
(2)(a) An insurer who is unable to provide the minimum twenty percent
discount or rate reduction required by this Subsection shall submit to the
commissioner a proposed discount or rate reduction and an actuarial
justification for the proposed discount or rate reduction.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-553 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 355
(b) If the commissioner determines that the proposed discount or rate
reduction is not justified, the commissioner shall require the insurer to submit
a new proposed discount or rate reduction.
(c) An aggrieved party affected by the commissioner's decision may
demand a hearing in accordance with Chapter 12 of this Title, R.S. 22:2191 et
seq.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.